Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202688-529
License fees.

(1)(a) The commission shall charge an annual license fee for each warehouse that is not licensed under the federal United States Warehouse Act, except as provided in section 88-531. Such fee is due on or before the date established by the commission for each license. The fee for any license issued for less than twelve months shall be prorated based on its duration.

(b) The commission shall not charge an annual license fee for a warehouse that is licensed under the federal United States Warehouse Act.

(2) Prior to July 1, 2027, the annual license fee shall be as provided in this subsection.

Capacity in BushelsFee0—10,000 $ 4510,001 —25,0005725,001—50,0006850,001—75,0007875,001 —100,00090100,001—150,000102150,001—200,000 113200,001—250,000125250,001 —300,000135300,001 —350,000147350,001 —400,000156400,001—450,000170450,001 —500,000180500,001 —600,000192600,001—700,000203700,001 —800,000215800,001—900,000225900,001 —1,000,0002371,000,001—2,000,0003382,000,001—3,000,0003953,000,001—4,000,0004504,000,001—5,000,0005075,000,001—6,000,0005636,000,001—7,000,0006207,000,001—8,000,0006758,000,001 —9,000,0007329,000,001—10,000,00078810,000,001—11,000,00084511,000,001—15,000,0001,07015,000,001—20,000,0001,35020,000,001—25,000,0001,63225,000,001—30,000,0001,91330,000,001—40,000,0002,47540,000,001 or more3,375

(3)(a) On or before December 1, 2026, the commission shall establish the annual license fees that apply beginning July 1, 2027, to warehouses that are not licensed under the federal United States Warehouse Act and electronically submit a schedule of such fees to the Clerk of the Legislature.

(b) Beginning in 2027, on or after July 1 of each year, the commission may modify the annual license fees established under subdivision (a) of this subsection.

(c) An annual license fee that is established or modified under this subsection shall not exceed the fee established for the applicable commodity in the 2025/2026 Rates Charged for AMS Services notice for entities with a Commodity Credit Corporation agreement, as such notice existed on January 1, 2026, that was published by the Agricultural Marketing Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(4) Fees collected under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit such fees that are paid:

(a) Prior to July 1, 2027, to the General Fund; and

(b) On or after July 1, 2027, to the Grain Dealer and Grain Warehouse Cash Fund.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 33;

Laws 2026, LB894, § 7.
July 18, 2026